Utah statutes.
11-36a-205.   Environmental mitigation impact fees.

Notwithstanding the requirements and prohibitions of this chapter, a local political subdivision may impose and assess an impact fee for environmental mitigation when:

(1)  the local political subdivision has formally agreed to fund a Habitat Conservation Plan to resolve conflicts with the Endangered Species Act of 1973, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531, et seq. or other state or federal environmental law or regulation;

(2)  the impact fee bears a reasonable relationship to the environmental mitigation required by the Habitat Conservation Plan; and

(3)  the legislative body of the local political subdivision adopts an ordinance or resolution:

(a)  declaring that an impact fee is required to finance the Habitat Conservation Plan;

(b)  establishing periodic sunset dates for the impact fee; and

(c)  requiring the legislative body to:

(i)  review the impact fee on those sunset dates;

(ii)  determine whether or not the impact fee is still required to finance the Habitat Conservation Plan; and

(iii)  affirmatively reauthorize the impact fee if the legislative body finds that the impact fee must remain in effect.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

